Utah statutes.
53A-16-112.   Growth in Student Population Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account
known as the "Growth in Student Population Restricted Account."
(2)  The account shall be funded from the following revenue sources:
(a)  any voluntary contributions received to help alleviate the anticipated
surge in student growth in public elementary and secondary schools during the
early part of the 21st Century; and
(b)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature.
(3)  The account shall be used to help school districts meet the challenges
created by anticipated significant increases in student growth in the state's
public schools.
(4) (a)  The account shall earn interest.
(b)  All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.
